Connecticut, session 2026, SB00037.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to eliminate the application fee
for each health care professional seeking licensure by the Department of
Public Health and cap the licensure fee for each such professional at two
hundred dollars.